Utah statutes.
73-5a-103.   Liability of owner or operator.
(1)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve an owner or
operator of a dam or reservoir of the legal duties, obligations, or
liabilities incident to the ownership or operation of the dam or reservoir.
(2)  The owner or operator of a dam or reservoir may not be held to be
strictly liable for any act or omission incident to the construction,
ownership, or operation of the dam or reservoir.
